Hawaii, session 2025, SB1152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for the Hawaii farm to food bank program to fund food banks and emergency feeding organizations in the State to purchase, store, and transport fresh locally grown or produced food to food insecure communities.  This program will serve the State's food needs, provide local food producers with a market to support their operations, and keep moneys circulating within the State to boost the local economy. SECTION 2. Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part     .  HAWAII FARM TO FOOD BANK PROGRAM §141-A  Definitions.  As used in this part: "Department" means the department of agriculture. "Food bank" has the same meaning as defined in title 7 United States Code section 7501(5). "Fresh locally grown or produced food" means fruits, vegetables, nuts, coffee, eggs, poultry and poultry products, livestock products, milk and milk products, aquacultural and maricultural products, and horticultural products that are one hundred per cent grown, raised, and harvested in Hawaii. §141-B Hawaii farm to food bank program. (a)  There is established the Hawaii farm to food bank program to be administered by the department.  Under the program, the department shall relieve food shortages by providing funds to food banks and emergency feeding organizations located in the State to facilitate consistent supply chains of fresh locally grown or produced food that is culturally relevant to food insecure communities. (b)  Food banks and emergency feeding organizations that receive support pursuant to this section shall use the funds to purchase, store, and transport fresh locally grown or produced food in the State that is culturally relevant to recipients at no cost to the recipients. §141-C  Hawaii food assistance program special fund. (a)  There is established in the state treasury the Hawaii food assistance program special fund, into which shall be deposited the following: (1)  Appropriations made by the legislature to the special fund; (2)  Gifts, donations, and grants from public agencies and private persons; and (3)  Interest accrued from moneys in the special fund. (b)  Expenditures from the Hawaii food assistance program special fund shall be authorized and administered by the department for the purposes of the Hawaii farm to food bank program established pursuant to section 141-B. §141-D Rules.  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this part." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the Hawaii food assistance program special fund established pursuant to section 141-C, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the Hawaii food assistance program special fund the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for uses consistent with the purposes of the Hawaii food assistance program special fund established pursuant to section 141-C, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________